src/fao-lex.txt
LEXICON kv10 ! dorg
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv11 ! song
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv12 ! bók
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv13 ! mørk
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv14 ! nátt
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ; ! XXX one t, nætur
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv15 ! tonn
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA  S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv16 ! mús
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv17 ! mastur
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv18 ! brúður
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^RDEL S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv19 ! fjøður
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv20 ! ær (only)
+N+Fem:ær S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:ær S-F-SGGEN-NULL ;
+N+Fem:ær F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:ó F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:á F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv21 ! gjógv
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv22 ! klógv
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv23 ! trúgv
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv24 ! kúgv
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv25 ! gás
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv26 ! tá
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv27 ! rás
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv28 ! dyr
# ;

LEXICON kv29 ! móðir
# ;

LEXICON kv30 ! dóttir
# ;

LEXICON kv31 ! systir
# ;

LEXICON kv32 ! mýri
# ;

LEXICON kv33 ! gleði
# ;

LEXICON kv34 ! kraft
# ;

LEXICON h1 ! eygja
# ;

LEXICON h2 ! hjarta
# ;

LEXICON h3 ! orð
# ;

LEXICON h4 ! boð
# ;

LEXICON h5 ! barn
# ;

LEXICON h6 ! lag
# ;

LEXICON h7 ! bræv
# ;

LEXICON h8 ! land
# ;

LEXICON h9 ! blikk
# ;

LEXICON h10 ! fall
# ;

LEXICON h11 ! hús
# ;

LEXICON h12 ! glas
# ;

LEXICON h13 ! setur
# ;

LEXICON h14 ! pistr
# ;

LEXICON h15 ! tjaldur
# ;

LEXICON h16 ! skýggj
# ;

LEXICON h17 ! kriggj
# ;

LEXICON h18 ! týggi
# ;

LEXICON hq9 ! prógv
# ;

LEXICON h20 ! búgv
# ;

LEXICON h21 ! plógv
# ;

LEXICON h22 ! ber
# ;

LEXICON h23 ! egg
# ;

LEXICON h24 ! kvæði
# ;

LEXICON h25 ! merki
# ;

LEXICON h26 ! tiðindi
# ;

LEXICON h27 ! systkin
# ;

LEXICON h28 ! bakari
# ;

LEXICON h29 ! kamar
# ;

LEXICON h30 ! summar
# ;

LEXICON h31 ! nummar
# ;

LEXICON h32 ! høvd
# ;

LEXICON h33 ! høvur
# ;

LEXICON h34 ! fæ
# ;



! =============== !
! Case inflection !
! =============== !

! This is the second layer. Here we do the indefinite
! forms.

! Masculine forms
! ---------------

! Weak case suffixes.
 
LEXICON W-M-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>i DF-NA-SGm ;

LEXICON W-M-SGACC
+Sg+Acc:%>a   DF-NA-SGm ;

LEXICON W-M-SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>a  DF-D-SGm ;

LEXICON W-M-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>a  DF-G-SGm ;


! Plural

LEXICON W-M-PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLNOM-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLACC-UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON W-M-PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%> DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON W-M-PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;



! Strong case suffixes
! --------------------

! Nominative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>ur DF-NA-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGNOM-NULL
+Sg+Nom: DF-NA-SGm ;


! Accusative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGACC
+Sg+Acc: DF-NA-SGm ;


! Dative Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGDAT
+Sg+Dat:%>i DF-D-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGDAT-NULL
+Sg+Dat: DF-D-SGm ;

! Genitive Sg

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>s DF-G-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN-NULL
+Sg+Gen: DF-G-SGm ;

LEXICON S-M-SGGEN-AR
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF-G-SGm ;


! Plural forms

! Nominative

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-N-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLNOM-NULL
+Pl+Nom:%> DF-N-PLm ;


! Accusative

LEXICON S-M-PLACC
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-IR
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-UR
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-A-PLm ;

LEXICON S-M-PLACC-NULL
+Pl+Acc:%> DF-A-PLm ;


! Dative

LEXICON S-M-PLDAT
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON S-M-PLDATm ! skóm
+Pl+Dat:%> DF-D-PL ;

! Genitive

LEXICON S-M-PLGEN
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;


! Feminine forms
! --------------

! Singular case suffixes.

! Nominative

LEXICON W-F-SGNOM
+Sg+Nom:%>a DF-N-SGf ;

LEXICON S-F-SGNAD
+Sg+Nom:%> DF-N-SGf ;
+Sg+Acc:%> DF-A-SGf ;
+Sg+Dat:%> DF-D-SGf ;

! Oblique

LEXICON W-F-SGOBL
+Sg+Acc:%>u DF-A-SGf ;
+Sg+Dat:%>u DF-D-SGf ;
+Sg+Gen:%>a DF-G-SGf ;

LEXICON S-F-SGGEN
+Sg+Gen:%>ar DF-G-SGf ;

LEXICON S-F-SGGEN-NULL
+Sg+Gen:%> DF-G-SGf ;




! Plural case suffixes

LEXICON F-PLNA-UR
+Pl+Nom:%>ur DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ur DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-IR
+Pl+Nom:%>ir DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ir DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-AR
+Pl+Nom:%>ar DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ar DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLNA-NULL
+Pl+Nom:%> DF-NA-PLf ;
+Pl+Acc:%> DF-NA-PLf ;

LEXICON F-PLDAT 
+Pl+Dat:%>u DF-D-PL ;

LEXICON F-PLGEN 
+Pl+Gen:%>a DF-G-PL ;



! Common cases

!LEXICON DF-DG-PL
! DF-D-PL ;
! DF-G-PL ;

LEXICON DF-D-PL
+Indef:%>m # ;
+Def:%>num # ;

LEXICON DF-G-PL
+Indef: # ;
+Def:nna # ;







! =================== !
! Definite inflection !
! =================== !

! This is the third layer. Here we do the definite forms.


! Masculine forms
! ---------------

LEXICON DF-NA-SGm
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>in # ;

LEXICON DF-D-SGm
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>num # ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGm
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>ins # ;

LEXICON DF-N-PLm
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>nir # ;

LEXICON DF-A-PLm
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>nar # ;

! Feminine forms
! ---------------

LEXICON DF-N-SGf
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>in # ;

LEXICON DF-A-SGf
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>ina # ;

LEXICON DF-D-SGf
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>ini # ;

LEXICON DF-G-SGf
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>innar # ;

LEXICON DF-NA-PLf
+Indef: # ;
+Def:%>nar # ;


! Neuter forms
! ---------------

!LEXICON DF-NA-SGn
!+Indef: # ;
!+Def:%>ið # ;

!LEXICON DF-D-SGn
!+Indef: # ;
!+Def:%>num # ;

!LEXICON DF-G-SGn
!+Indef: # ;
!+Def:%>ins # ;

!LEXICON DF-NA-PLn
!+Indef: # ;
!+Def:%>ini # ;



! ==================== !
! Adjective morphology !
! ==================== !


LEXICON l1	! beinur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l2	! leysur
adj-a ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l3	! bíligur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l4	! kunnugur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l5	! spiltur
adj-a ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l6	! brekaður
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l7	! blindur
adj-a ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l8	! kaldur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l9	! spakur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l10 ! drúgvur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l11 ! flógvur
adj-a ; ! -gv-
adj-def ; ! -gv-

LEXICON l12 ! snjallur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l13 ! langur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l14 ! harður
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l15 ! blíður
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

! Check these

LEXICON l16 ! góður
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l17 ! bláur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l18 ! keddur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l19 ! n´yggjur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l20 ! stillur
adj-a ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l21 ! fastur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l22 ! klæddur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
			 a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l23 ! rættur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
			 a-umlaut ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l24 ! frískur
adj-a ;
adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l25 ! danskur
         a-non-umlaut ;
:%^UUML      a-umlaut ;
            adj-r-gen ;
adj-def ;

LEXICON l26 ! vakin
adj-def ;

LEXICON l27 ! heiðin
adj-def ;

LEXICON l28 ! lítil
adj-def ;

LEXICON l29 ! fakur
adj-def ;

LEXICON l30 ! tepur
adj-def ;

LEXICON l31 ! trupul
adj-def ;

LEXICON l32 ! búgvin
adj-def ;

LEXICON l33 ! gamal
adj-def ;

LEXICON l34 ! dottin
adj-def ;

LEXICON l35 ! feingin
adj-def ;

LEXICON l36 ! liðugur
adj-def ;

LEXICON l37 ! grammur
adj-def ;

LEXICON l38 ! kollutur
adj-def ;

LEXICON l39 ! settur
adj-def ;



! Intermediate adjectival lexica
! ==============================

LEXICON adj-a
 a-non-umlaut ;
     a-umlaut ;
     
LEXICON a-non-umlaut
 a-m-sg-n ;
 a-m-pl-n ;
 a-f-pl-n ;
 a-m-sg-a ;
 a-m-pl-a ;
 a-f-sg-a ;
 a-f-pl-a ;
 a-n-sg-a ;
 a-f-sg-d ;
 a-f-pl-d ;
 a-m-sg-g ;
 a-m-pl-g ;
 a-f-sg-g ;
 a-f-pl-g ;
 a-n-sg-g ;
 a-n-pl-g ;

LEXICON a-umlaut
 a-m-sg-d ;
 a-m-pl-d ;
 a-f-sg-n ;
 a-n-sg-n ;
 a-n-sg-d ;
 a-n-pl-n ;
 a-n-pl-a ;
 a-n-pl-d ;


LEXICON adj-r-gen
a-m-pl-g-ra ;
a-f-sg-g-rar ;
a-f-pl-g-ra ;
a-n-pl-g-ra ;

! Adjectival case lexica
! ======================

LEXICON a-m-sg-n
+A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur # ;

LEXICON a-m-sg-a
+A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an # ;

LEXICON a-m-sg-d
+A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a-m-sg-g
+A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s  # ; 

LEXICON a-m-pl-n
+A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ; 

LEXICON a-m-pl-a
+A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a-m-pl-d
+A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a-m-pl-g
+A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a-m-pl-g-ra
+A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-sg-n
+A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>%^UUML  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-sg-a
+A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a  # ;  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-sg-d
+A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-sg-g
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-sg-g-rar
+A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-pl-n
+A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-pl-a
+A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-pl-d
+A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-pl-g
+A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a-f-pl-g-ra
+A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-sg-n
+A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-sg-a
+A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-sg-d
+A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-sg-g
+A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-pl-n
+A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%> # ; 

LEXICON a-n-pl-a
+A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> # ; 

LEXICON a-n-pl-d
+A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-pl-g
+A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a  # ; 

LEXICON a-n-pl-g-ra
+A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra  # ; 


LEXICON adj-def
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +A+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;






! =============== !
! Verb morphology !
! =============== !


LEXICON s1  ! nevna
standard-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s2  ! keypa
standard-ir ;
:%>d l39 ;

LEXICON s3  ! leiða
standard-ir ;
:%>d l18 ;

LEXICON s4  ! frøa
inf ;
pres-ir ;
prt-dd ;
imp-prsprt ;
sup-tt ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s5  ! senda
standard-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s6  ! hirða
standard-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s7  ! rista
standard-ir ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s8  ! kenna
standard-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;

LEXICON s9  ! klippa
standard-ir ;
:%>d l5 ;

LEXICON s10 ! fylgja
standard-j-ir ;
:%>d l7 ;
